Mississippi, session 2026, HB752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  (a)  There is created the Mississippi Young Readers Club (MYRC) as a one-school-year pilot program to provide developmentally appropriate books and literacy materials to students attending participating public schools.  The program shall be administered by the Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction (CELI) at the University of Mississippi, which shall serve as the administrative and fiscal agent of the program. (b)  The Mississippi Young Readers Club shall operate as a pilot program for one (1) school year, beginning with the 20262027 school year, unless continued in subsequent years by legislative appropriation. (2)  The purpose of the program is to expand access to high-quality books in the home and support family engagement in at-home reading, and complement existing state literacy initiatives, including the Literacy-Based Promotion Act and the Mississippi Comprehensive Literacy Plan, by supporting early literacy development and establishing and expanding home libraries. SECTION 2. (1)  Participation in the Mississippi Young Readers Club shall be school-based. The Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction (CELI) at the University of Mississippi shall select participating public schools or districts based on available funding and program design considerations.  For the pilot year, the administrator shall identify a subset of the eventual statewide population with the intent of serving a sizable and meaningful number of students sufficient to assess program feasibility, reach and family engagement.  In its selection of participating schools or districts, the Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction shall seek to prioritize schools serving student populations that include a high proportion of striving readers and students with limited access to books and other resources necessary to establish home libraries.  Such schools may meet a combination of the following characteristics: (a)  Serve high concentrations of economically disadvantaged students; (b)  Be designated as Title I schools; (c)  Serve a high percentage of students identified as striving readers; (d)  Be identified for improvement, intervention, or additional support; or (e)  Operate within alternative, turnaround or achievement-focused school structures. (2)  The Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction shall consult with the Mississippi Department of Education in identifying participating schools or districts to ensure alignment with statewide literacy priorities.  Subject to appropriation, the Mississippi Young Readers Club may be expanded in future years to serve additional schools or grade levels, including students in prekindergarten through Grade 3, or any other grades as determined appropriate by the Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction. (3)  Each participating student shall receive no fewer than twelve (12) age-appropriate books during the school year.  Books and materials provided through the program shall align with Mississippi's literacy goals, be developmentally appropriate for use in family settings, and support the establishment or expansion of a home library. Book selection shall be conducted by the Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction.  All books provided through the program shall become the property of the participating student or family. SECTION 3. (1)  The Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction is authorized to establish partnerships and enter into contracts with qualified organizations for the selection, preparation, distribution and support of books and literacy materials in accordance with applicable state procurement and purchasing laws. The State Department of Education shall serve in a consultative and collaborative role to support alignment with statewide literacy initiatives. (2)  (a)  The Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction shall compile and analyze information related to implementation of the pilot, which may include: (i)  Participation and reach; (ii)  Family engagement and feedback; (iii) Implementation quality and operational performance indicator; and (iv)  Evidence-based takeaways. (b)  The Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction shall use the information compiled under paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to develop recommendations for the Legislature and the State Department of Education regarding future implementation or expansion of the program.  The manner, format and timing of the analysis and recommendations shall be determined by the Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction. SECTION 4. (1)  Implementation of the Mississippi Young Readers Club (MYRC) is subject to appropriation by the Legislature.  Upon successful implementation of the pilot program, the Center for Excellence in Literacy Instruction is authorized to accept, solicit and expend private, philanthropic or other nonstate funds, including private matching funds, to supplement or expand the program. However, the acceptance of such funds does not obligate the Legislature to make future appropriations for the support and administration of the program. (2)  Subject to appropriation by the Legislature, the pilot program implemented may be extended in subsequent school years and expanded administratively to serve additional schools or grade levels, including prekindergarten through Grade 3, or any other grades as funding allows. SECTION 5.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.